Arkansas, session 2025, SB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas has the third highest combined state and local
sales tax rate in the nation;
(2) One (1) of the reasons Arkansas has a high sales tax rate is
because the state levies more sales tax than is required to fund the Property
Tax Relief Trust Fund, which has a growing balance; and
(3) It is necessary to provide relief from sales tax for all
Arkansans.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-302(c)(1), concerning the additional
sales tax levied to fund property tax relief, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Except for food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-
52-317 and except for used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that
are taxed under § 26-52-324, there is levied an additional excise tax of one-
*JLL242*
02-27-2025 09:47:44 JLL242

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 SB289
half of one percent (0.5%) three hundred seventy-five thousandths percent
(0.375%) upon all taxable sales of property, specified digital products,
digital codes, and services subject to the tax levied by this chapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-53-107(c)(1), concerning the additional
use tax levied to fund property tax relief, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) There is levied an additional excise tax of one-half of one
percent (0.5%) three hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (0.375%) upon
all tangible personal property, specified digital products, digital codes,
and taxable services subject to the tax levied by this subchapter except for
food and food ingredients that are taxed under § 26-53-145 and except for
used motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers that are taxed under § 26-53-
150.

SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.

/s/J. Dotson

















02-27-2025 09:47:44 JLL242